Maryland, session 2025, HB0662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) [“Designated procurement unit” means:
(1) the Department of General Services;
(2) the Department of Transportation; or
(3) the Department of Information Technology, only with respect to an
information technology master contract executed before July 1, 2022, until the earlier of:
(i) the expiration date of all information technology master
contracts; or
(ii) June 30, 2027.
(c)] “eMaryland Marketplace” or “eMaryland Marketplace Advantage” means the
Internet–based procurement system managed by the Department of General Services.
[(d)] (C) “Evaluated bid price” means the price of a bid after adjustment in
accordance with objective measurable criteria.
[(e)] (D) “Master contracting” means a streamlined procurement method that
provides for the qualification of bidders and offerors for the procurement of services,
supplies, or commodities.
[(f)] (E) (1) “Objective measurable criteria” means standards that enable the
State to compare the economy, effectiveness, or value of the subject of the bids.
(2) “Objective measurable criteria” includes standards of reliability,
operational costs, maintainability, useful life, and residual value.
[(g)] (F) “Pay–for–success contracting” means a performance–based
procurement method through which a unit contracts with an organization to deliver
services or commodities in exchange for payment based on the achievement of outcomes.
[(h)] (G) “Person” includes, unless the context requires otherwise:

HOUSE BILL 662 3
(1) the State;
(2) a county, a municipal corporation, or any other political subdivision;
and
(3) any unit of the State government or a political subdivision.
[(i)] (H) “Task order” means a procurement process in which only those vendors
with master contracts may compete to provide the services, supplies, or commodities under
the procurement.
13–113.
(a) [The designated procurement units] A UNIT may adopt master contracting, a
streamlined procurement method, to provide for the qualification of an offeror in one or
more categories of services, supplies, or commodities.
(b) If a [designated procurement] unit adopts master contracting, the master
contracting method shall include:
(1) the categories of services, supplies, or commodities in which an offeror
may submit a proposal for qualification;
(2) a procedure for the consideration and approval of proposals for
qualification of multiple offerors in each category of services, supplies, or commodities;
(3) the execution of a standard contract for a specified period of time
between the State and an offeror approved as a master contractor; and
(4) a performance evaluation procedure to be used by a unit [of the
Executive Branch] to evaluate the performance of a qualified offeror that has completed
work on a task order.
(c) (1) A unit [of the Executive Branch] that requires services, supplies, or
commodities covered under a master contract may issue a solicitation for a task order to a
master contractor consistent with the regulations adopted under § 13–114 of this subtitle.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the solicitation for a
task order shall include a statement of the:
(i) factors that will be used in evaluating a master contractor’s
response; and
(ii) relative importance of each factor.

HOUSE BILL 662
(d) (1) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, if the unit [of the
Executive Branch] expects that the total cost of the services, supplies, or commodities will
exceed $100,000, the unit shall issue a solicitation for a task order to all master contractors
in the appropriate category established by the [designated procurement] unit.
(2) If the unit [of the Executive Branch] expects that the total cost of the
services, supplies, or commodities will be $100,000 or less, the unit shall issue a solicitation
for a task order to a minimum of six qualified master contractors or all master contractors,
whichever is less, in the appropriate category established by the [designated procurement]
unit.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, after a unit [of the
Executive Branch] receives responses from master contractors to a solicitation for a task
order, the unit shall evaluate the responses and may select a master contractor based on
the response that is determined to be the most advantageous to the State considering the
evaluation factors set forth in the task order.
(f) The requirements of subsections (c)(2), (d), and (e) of this section do not apply
to a master contract for construction if the master contract:
(1) is awarded through a competitive process in accordance with this
subtitle; and
(2) states:
(i) how task orders will be awarded; and
(ii) the maximum number of qualified contractors that will be
awarded a master contract for construction.
13–114.
(a) The Board shall adopt regulations in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 1 of
the State Government Article to establish a uniform process for the solicitation of master
contracts and task orders.
(b) Each [designated procurement] unit shall ensure compliance with the
regulations set forth in subsection (a) of this section.
13–212.2.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A PROCUREMENT AWARDED THROUGH
A PROCUREMENT METHOD LISTED IN § 13–102(A)(1) THROUGH (4) OR (6) THROUGH
(11) OF THIS TITLE AND THAT RESULTS IN MULTIPLE CONTRACTS BEING AWARDED.

HOUSE BILL 662 5
(B) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, A PROCUREMENT
OFFICER MAY AWARD AN INDEFINITE QUANTITY CONTRACT.
(C) (1) AN INDEFINITE QUANTITY CONTRACT SHALL INCLUDE AN
AGREEMENT ON:
(I) THE SPECIFIC SCOPE OF SERVICES TO BE PERFORMED;
(II) THE MAXIMUM HOURS OR FEES APPROVED FOR THE
SPECIFIC WORK ASSIGNMENT; AND
(III) OTHER MATTERS PERTINENT TO THE WORK ASSIGNMENT.
(2) THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER AND CONTRACTOR SHALL EXECUTE
EACH WORK ORDER SUBJECT TO THE TERMS OF THE INDEFINITE QUANTITY
CONTRACT.
(3) EACH SIGNED WORK ORDER SHALL BECOME PART OF THE
INDEFINITE QUANTITY CONTRACT.
(D) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING METHODS OF ASSIGNING WORK UNDER AN
INDEFINITE QUANTITY CONTRACT, INCLUDING:
(1) ASSIGNMENT BY RIGHT OF FIRST REFUSAL IN THE ORDER OF
RANKING OF CONTRACT AWARDS; AND
(2) ROTATION AMONG CONTRACTORS.
(E) IF A METHOD OF ASSIGNING WORK ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION
(D) OF THIS SECTION CONFLICTS WITH A FEDERAL FUNDING REQUIREMENT ON A
PROJECT, THE FEDERAL METHOD FOR ASSIGNING WORK SHALL BE USED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.